Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-3,172
Registration in incorrect county; penalty.

Any person applying for a motor vehicle or trailer registration in any county or location other than that specified in section 60-385 or 60-3,198 shall be deemed guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 172.